New York, session 2025-2026, A11486.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The election law is amended by adding a new section 7-127 2 to read as follows: 3 § 7-127. Notification to accompany all early mail, absentee, and 4 special ballots capable of return by mail. 1. Notwithstanding any other 5 provision of law to the contrary, any ballot issued pursuant to this 6 chapter that is permitted to be returned by mail shall be accompanied by 7 a conspicuous written notice, in a form prescribed by the state board of 8 elections, informing the voter of all the methods by which such ballot 9 may be timely returned under applicable law, including, as applicable, 10 return by mail, express delivery services, delivery by the voter or 11 agent to the appropriate board of elections, or appropriate early voting 12 site or poll site on election day, and deposit in a ballot drop box 13 established pursuant to section 8-416 of this chapter. 14 2. Such notice shall advise the voter that, to ensure timely receipt, 15 such ballot should be returned to the board of elections as soon as 16 possible by any approved methods, and further recommend the use of 17 alternative methods of return besides domestic mail services if the 18 voter will be returning their ballot within several days of the 19 election. The notice shall also include a reminder of the importance of 20 seeking a hand cancellation date for any ballot returned by domestic 21 postal mail to ensure the date of mailing can always be determined. For 22 overseas voters, such notice shall advise voters to consult the antic- 23 ipated delivery times of their chosen delivery service to ensure ballots 24 will be returned timely. Such notice shall include the website and tele- 25 phone number of the appropriate board of elections for the location and 26 hours of operation of ballot drop-off locations and information about 27 other return options. The state board of elections, each county board of EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD15902-04-6 A. 11486 2 1 elections, and the New York city board of elections, shall prominently 2 publish such notice, or a substantially similar notice, in a conspicuous 3 location on its official website, and shall also transmit such notice, 4 or a substantially similar notice, to any electronic mail address or 5 telephone number maintained by such board with respect to any voter who 6 has requested an early mail ballot, and post the same on any official 7 social media account maintained by such board. 8 3. The state board of elections shall promulgate any rules and regu- 9 lations necessary to implement the provisions of this section. 10 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately.